Idaho, session 2025, H0244.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 57, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-5719, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-5719. ILLEGAL ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICE BRAND LIST. (1) By July 1,
2025, the department shall publish on its public website a list of electronic
smoking device brands that may not be sold for retail sale in this state or to
a consumer in this state.
(2)(a) The illegal electronic smoking devices brand list shall include
the following:
(i) Brand families of electronic smoking devices where a SKU in
the brand family has been identified in an FDA warning letter as
being adulterated or misbranded under the federal food, drug, and
cosmetic act;
(ii) Brand families of electronic smoking devices where a SKU in
the brand family is currently included in an FDA import alert;
(iii) Brand families of electronic smoking devices where a SKU in
the brand family has been the subject of an FDA seizure order or
warrant;
(iv) Brand families of electronic smoking devices where a SKU in
the brand family has been identified in a civil monetary complaint
as being adulterated or misbranded under the federal food, drug,
and cosmetic act; and
(v) Brand families of electronic smoking devices where a SKU in
the brand family has been identified in a civil or criminal com-
plaint filed by the United States department of justice as being
adulterated or misbranded under the federal food, drug, and cos-
metic act.
(b) The illegal electronic smoking device brand list shall not include
products where the enforcement actions listed in paragraph (a) of this
subsection have been withdrawn, stayed, enjoined, or set aside by the
agency or a court.
(c) The illegal electronic smoking device brand list shall not include
products where an enforcement action listed in paragraph (a) of this


subsection is based on retailer misconduct rather than on the char-
acteristics of the electronic smoking device or its packaging or on
conduct by the manufacturer of the electronic smoking device.
(3) The department shall maintain a list of electronic smoking devices
that are exempt from inclusion on the illegal electronic smoking device
brand list. Electronic smoking devices that are not included on the illegal
electronic smoking device brand list shall be added to the exemption list if:
(a) The electronic smoking device has received a marketing granted or-
der from the FDA pursuant to 21 CFR 1114;
(b) The electronic smoking device contains nicotine derived from to-
bacco, was marketed in the United States as of August 8, 2016, is the
subject of an application pursuant to 21 U.S.C. 387j that was submitted
to the FDA on or before September 9, 2020, and accepted for filing, and
the application either remains under review by the FDA or has received a
denial order that has been and remains stayed by the FDA or court order,
rescinded by the FDA, or vacated by a court;
(c) The electronic smoking device was not required to receive FDA au-
thorization prior to marketing because it does not contain nicotine; or
(d) The electronic smoking device is a rebrand as defined in subsection
(11) of this section.
(4) Beginning September 1, 2025, or sixty (60) days after the date that
the department first makes the illegal electronic smoking device brand list
available for public inspection on its public website, whichever is later,
electronic smoking device brand families included on the illegal electronic
smoking device brand list may not be sold for retail sale in this state or to a
consumer in this state, either directly or through an importer, distributor,
wholesaler, retailer, seller, or similar intermediary or intermediaries.
(5) The department shall update the illegal electronic smoking device
brand list and exemption list at least monthly and provide notice of changes
to sellers, distributors, and wholesalers of electronic smoking devices.
(6) After the department adds additional products to the illegal elec-
tronic smoking device brand list pursuant to subsection (5) of this section,
each seller, distributor, and wholesaler shall have sixty (60) days from the
date such brand families are added to the list to remove SKUs in those brand
families or made by those manufacturers from its inventory.
(7)(a) A seller, distributor, or wholesaler who sells or offers for
sale an electronic smoking device in this state in violation of the pro-
visions of this section shall be subject to the following penalties:
(i) In the case of a first violation, the seller, distributor,
or wholesaler shall be subject to a fine of five thousand dollars
($5,000) per violation;
(ii) In the case of a second violation in a two (2) year period,
the seller, distributor, or wholesaler shall be fined five thou-
sand dollars ($5,000) per brand family and its permit shall be sus-
pended for seven (7) days;
(iii) In the case of a third violation in a two (2) year period,
the seller, distributor, or wholesaler shall be fined five thou-
sand dollars ($5,000) per brand family and its permit shall be sus-
pended for thirty (30) days;


(iv) In the case of a fourth violation in a two (2) year period,
the seller, distributor, or wholesaler shall be fined five thou-
sand dollars ($5,000) per brand family and its permit shall be sus-
pended for one (1) year; and
(v) In the case of a fifth violation, the seller, distributor, or
wholesaler shall be fined five thousand dollars ($5,000) per brand
family and its permit shall be revoked.
(b) Offers to sell or sales of an electronic smoking device included in
the illegal electronic smoking device brand list that are part of the
same brand family shall constitute a single violation.
(8) Any electronic smoking devices in a brand family that are included
on the illegal electronic smoking device brand list that are held for sale
or offered for sale are hereby declared to be contraband goods and shall be
seized without a warrant by the department, an employee of the department,
or any peace officer when directed by the department. Electronic smoking de-
vices seized pursuant to this section shall be subject to destruction or dis-
posal and may not be purchased or sold for retail sale in this state. The cost
of such seizure and destruction or disposal shall be borne by the person from
whom the products are seized.
(9) Each retailer, distributor, or wholesaler that sells or dis-
tributes electronic smoking devices in this state shall be subject to at
least two (2) unannounced compliance checks annually by the department for
purposes of enforcing this section. The inspection may be conducted dur-
ing the same inspection conducted pursuant to section 39-5710, Idaho Code.
Unannounced follow-up compliance checks of all noncompliant retailers,
distributors, and wholesalers shall be conducted by the department within
thirty (30) days after any violation of this chapter. The department shall
publish the results of all compliance checks at least quarterly and shall
make the results available to the public on request.
(10) By July 1, 2025, the department shall establish an electronic mail
address through which violations of this section may be reported to the de-
partment.
(11) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Brand family" means all styles of electronic smoking devices sold
under the same trademark and differentiated from one another by means of
additional modifiers, and includes the use of a brand name, trademark,
logo, symbol, motto, selling message, recognizable pattern of colors or
other indicia similar to or identifiable with a previously known brand
of alternative nicotine products, electronic nicotine delivery sys-
tems, or nicotine liquids.
(b) "Distributor" means:
(i) Any person engaged in the business of selling tobacco prod-
ucts or electronic smoking devices in this state who brings, or
causes to be brought, into this state from outside the state any
tobacco products or electronic smoking devices for sale;
(ii) Any person who makes, manufactures, or fabricates tobacco
products or electronic smoking devices in this state for sale in
this state; or
(iii) Any person engaged in the business of selling tobacco prod-
ucts or electronic smoking devices outside this state who ships or


transports tobacco products or electronic smoking devices to re-
tailers in this state to be sold by those retailers.
(c) "FDA" means the United States food and drug administration.
(d) "Manufacturer" means any person who manufacturers and sells to-
bacco products or electronic smoking devices.
(e) "Rebrand" means a product for which the manufacturer was not re-
quired to submit a premarket tobacco product application for the elec-
tronic smoking device because the electronic smoking device reflects
changes to the name, brand style, or packaging of a vapor product or con-
sumable product.
(f) "Retailer" means any person engaged in the business of selling to-
bacco products or electronic smoking devices to ultimate consumers.
(g) "SKU" means a stock keeping unit number, a unique product identi-
fier assigned to an individual electronic smoking device product, or a
particular variety of an electronic smoking device within a brand fam-
ily.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after May
1, 2025.